Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.025

Transfer of proceeding.

(1) This section does not apply to a guardianship or conservatorship for an adult that is subject to the transfer provisions of the uniform adult guardianship and protective proceedings jurisdiction act (chapter 11.90 RCW).

(2) After appointment of a guardian or conservator, the court that made the appointment may transfer the proceeding to a court in another county in this state or another state if transfer is in the best interest of the individual subject to the guardianship or conservatorship.

(3) If a proceeding for a guardianship or conservatorship is pending in another state or a foreign country and a petition for guardianship or conservatorship for the same individual is filed in a court in this state, the court shall notify the court in the other state or foreign country and, after consultation with that court, assume or decline jurisdiction, whichever is in the best interest of the respondent.

(4) A guardian or conservator appointed in another state or country may petition the court for appointment as a guardian or conservator in this state for the same individual if jurisdiction in this state is or will be established. The appointment may be made on proof of appointment in the other state or foreign country and presentation of a certified copy of the part of the court record in the other state or country specified by the court in this state.

(5) Notice of hearing on a petition under subsection (4) of this section, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to the respondent, if the respondent is at least twelve years of age at the time of the hearing, and to the persons that would be entitled to notice if the procedures for appointment of a guardian or conservator under this chapter were applicable. The court shall make the appointment unless it determines the appointment would not be in the best interest of the respondent.

(6) Not later than fourteen days after appointment under subsection (5) of this section, the guardian or conservator shall give a copy of the order of appointment to the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship, if the individual is at least twelve years of age, and to all persons given notice of the hearing on the petition.

[ 2019 c 437 s 105.]